Utah statutes.
76-10-1225.   Prosecution of pornographic film violations by county attorney, district attorney, or city attorney.

The county attorney of the county where the violation occurred or within a prosecution district where the violation occurred, the district attorney shall file and prosecute any action for violations of this act unless the violation occurs in a city of the first or second class.  If the violation occurs in such a city, the action may be commenced and prosecuted by either the city attorney or the county attorney.  All fines imposed for any violation of this act shall be paid to the political subdivision employing the prosecuting attorney.



Amended by Chapter 38, 1993 General Session

